Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202483-180.01
Risk assessment tools; study; evaluation.

On or before October 1, 2025, the department shall complete a study examining risk assessment tools employed by the department, the board, and the Office of Probation Administration. The department shall evaluate the feasibility of establishing a unified risk assessment framework across all criminal justice agencies.

Laws 2024, LB631, § 42.
July 19, 2024